District of Columbia statutes.
5-1501.12

Functions of the Board.

The Board shall:

(1)

Review all reports of allegations of professional negligence, misconduct, or misidentification or other testing error that occurred in the provision of forensic science services at the Department;

(2)

Periodically review the program standards and protocols related to Department operations;

(3)

At least once every 3 years, conduct a review of relevant scientific literature to determine whether modification of any of the manuals and procedures referenced in § 5-1501.04(b) is desirable;

(4)

Review and make recommendations as necessary to the Director concerning:

(A)

The quality and timeliness of the forensic science services at the Department;

(B)

New scientific programs, protocols, methods of testing, and forensic technologies;

(C)

Plans for:

(i)

The implementation of new programs;

(ii)

Sustaining existing programs;

(iii)

Improving programs, where possible; and

(iv)

The elimination of programs no longer needed;

(D)

Qualification standards for analyst positions within the Department; and

(E)

Any other matters related to the scientific operation of the Department; and

(5)

Advise the Director or the Mayor and Council, when it considers appropriate, on matters relating to the Department or forensic science.

History

Aug. 17, 2011, D.C. Law 19-18, § 13, 58 DCR 5403